trunk/apertium-swe-dan/dev/saldo/saldo.nouns.dix
<pardef n="id__n_v">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="djäv/ul__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>ul</l>        <r>ul<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ulen</l>      <r>ul<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lar</l>       <r>ul<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>larna</l>     <r>ul<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="staffli__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="deponens__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="stigma__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ta</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tana</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="demo__n_v">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sar</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sen</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sarna</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rna</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="f__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>:et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>f</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:en</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-en</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="åd/er__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ern</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ror</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rorna</l>     <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="tevatt/en__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>net</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="exam/en__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ina</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ina</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="vån__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="l__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>:et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>l</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:en</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-en</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="amaryll/is__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>isen</l>      <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isar</l>      <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isarna</l>    <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="realexamen">      <i>realexam</i><par n="exam/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="amaryllis">       <i>amaryll</i><par n="amaryll/is__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="mogenhetsexamen"> <i>mogenhetsexam</i><par n="exam/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="gäcken">          <i>gäcken</i><par n="vån__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="dato">            <i>dato</i><par n="vån__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="doktorsexamen">   <i>doktorsexam</i><par n="exam/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="ekonomexamen">    <i>ekonomexam</i><par n="exam/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="en-tous-cas">     <i>en-tous-cas</i><par n="vån__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="tentamen">        <i>tentam</i><par n="exam/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="deponens">        <i>deponens</i><par n="deponens__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="sidotema">        <i>sidotema</i><par n="stigma__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="l">               <i>l</i><par n="l__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="huvudtema">       <i>huvudtema</i><par n="stigma__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="tji">             <i>tji</i><par n="vån__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="hejd">            <i>hejd</i><par n="vån__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="skepparexamen">   <i>skepparexam</i><par n="exam/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="demo">            <i>demo</i><par n="demo__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="uppsjö">          <i>uppsjö</i><par n="vån__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="examen">          <i>exam</i><par n="exam/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="motvärn">         <i>motvärn</i><par n="vån__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="sångtema">        <i>sångtema</i><par n="stigma__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="ämbetsexamen">    <i>ämbetsexam</i><par n="exam/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="nordanskog">      <i>nordanskog</i><par n="vån__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="stigma">          <i>stigma</i><par n="stigma__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="hoper">           <i>hoper</i><par n="vån__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="staffli">         <i>staffli</i><par n="staffli__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="f">               <i>f</i><par n="f__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="studentexamen">   <i>studentexam</i><par n="exam/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="sicksack">        <i>sicksack</i><par n="vån__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="styrbord">        <i>styrbord</i><par n="vån__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="abiturientexamen"><i>abiturientexam</i><par n="exam/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="åder">            <i>åd</i><par n="åd/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="pulsåder">        <i>pulsåd</i><par n="åd/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="källåder">        <i>källåd</i><par n="åd/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="djävul">          <i>djäv</i><par n="djäv/ul__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="blodåder">        <i>blodåd</i><par n="åd/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="mjölkåder">       <i>mjölkåd</i><par n="åd/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="lungpulsåder">    <i>lungpulsåd</i><par n="åd/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="emservatten">     <i>emservatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="trikloretylen">   <i>trikloretylen</i><par n="id__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="brackvatten">     <i>brackvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="natriumbikarbonat"><i>natriumbikarbonat</i><par n="id__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="volfram">         <i>volfram</i><par n="id__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="marvatten">       <i>marvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="argon">           <i>argon</i><par n="id__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="koffein">         <i>koffein</i><par n="id__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="kylvatten">       <i>kylvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="mjukvatten">      <i>mjukvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="matarvatten">     <i>matarvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="drav">            <i>drav</i><par n="id__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="kölvatten">       <i>kölvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="id">              <i>id</i><par n="id__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="bittervatten">    <i>bittervatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="palmitin">        <i>palmitin</i><par n="id__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="gödselvatten">    <i>gödselvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kristallvatten">  <i>kristallvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="propen">          <i>propen</i><par n="id__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="bjugg">           <i>bjugg</i><par n="id__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="dopvatten">       <i>dopvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="ozon">            <i>ozon</i><par n="id__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="eten">            <i>eten</i><par n="id__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="blodvatten">      <i>blodvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
